Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.120

Copies of records as evidence.

Copies of the commission's proceedings, records, and acts, when certified by the secretary and authenticated by the corporate seal, shall be admissible in all courts as prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.28.120. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 13, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-22, part.]